test/src/old-gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-nitonawew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - nitonawêw - ok : # VTA (VTA2 AEW) 

###PRS###
## INDEPENDENT ##
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1SgO:    kinitonawin # LOCAL DIR
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1PlO:    kinitonawinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1PlO:    kinitonawinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1SgO:    kinitonawinâwâw

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2SgO:    kinitonâtin # LOCAL INVERSE
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2SgO:    kinitonâtinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2PlO:    kinitonâtinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2PlO:    kinitonâtinâwâw


     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO:    ninitonawâw # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO:    kinitonawâw
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO:    ninitonawânân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO:    kinitonawânaw
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO:    kinitonawâwâw
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO:    ninitonawâwak # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO:    kinitonawâwak
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO:    ninitonawânânak
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO:    kinitonawânawak
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO:    kinitonawâwâwak

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ninitonâmâwa # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kinitonâmâwa
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ninitonâmânâna
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kinitonâmânawa
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kinitonâmâwâwa

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO:    ninitonâk # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO:    kinitonâk
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO:    ninitonâkonân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO:    kinitonâkonaw
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO:    kinitonâkowâw
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO:    [ninitonâkowak, ninitonâkwak] # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO:    [kinitonâkowak, kinitonâkwak]
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO:    ninitonâkonânak
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO:    kinitonâkonawak
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO:    kinitonâkowâwak

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ninitonâmâwa # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kinitonâmâwa
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ninitonâmânâna
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kinitonâmânawa
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kinitonâmâwâwa

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    nitonawêw # THIRD DIR
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nitonawêwak
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:    nitonawêyiwa
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    nitonâmêw
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    nitonâmêwak

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    [nitonâk, nitonâkow] # THIRD INV
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    [nitonâkowak, nitonâkwak]
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nitonâkoyiwa


## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-nitonawiyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-nitonawiyâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-nitonawiyâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-nitonawiyêk

     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-nitonâtân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-nitonâtâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-nitonâtâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-nitonâtakok


     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO:    ê-nitonawak # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO:    ê-nitonawat
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO:    ê-nitonawâyâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO:   ê-nitonawâyahk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO:    ê-nitonawâyêk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO:    ê-nitonawakik # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO:    ê-nitonawacik
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO:    ê-nitonawâyâhkik
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO:   ê-nitonawâyahkok
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO:    ê-nitonawâyêkok

     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonâmak # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonâmat
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonâmâyâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:   ê-nitonâmâyahk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonâmâyêk

     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO:    ê-nitonawit # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO:    ê-nitonâsk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO:    ê-nitonâkoyâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO:   ê-nitonâkoyahk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO:    ê-nitonâkoyêk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO:    ê-nitonawicik # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO:    ê-nitonâskik
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO:    ê-nitonâkoyâhkik
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO:   ê-nitonâkoyahkok
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO:    ê-nitonâkoyêkok

     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:    ê-nitonâmit # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:    ê-nitonâmisk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:    ê-nitonâkoyâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO:   ê-nitonâkoyahk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:    ê-nitonâkoyêk

     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonawât # THIRD DIR
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonawâcik
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ê-nitonawâyit
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonâmât
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    ê-nitonâmâcik

     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    ê-nitonâkot # THIRD INV
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    ê-nitonâkocik
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-nitonâkoyit

## FUTURE CONDITIONAL ##
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO:    nitonawiyani # LOCAL DIR
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1PlO:    nitonawiyâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1PlO:    nitonawiyâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO:    nitonawiyêko

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2SgO:    nitonâtâni # LOCAL INVERSE
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2SgO:    nitonâtâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2PlO:    nitonâtâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2PlO:    nitonâtako


     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO:    nitonawaki # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO:    nitonawaci
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO:    nitonawâyâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO:   [nitonawâyahko, nitonawâyahki]
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO:    nitonawâyêko
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO:    nitonawakwâwi # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO:    nitonawatwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO:    nitonawâyâhkwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO:   nitonawâyahkwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO:    nitonawâyêkwâwi

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    nitonâmaki # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    nitonâmaci
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nitonâmâyâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:   [nitonâmâyahko, nitonâmâyahki]
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nitonâmâyêko

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO:    nitonawici # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO:    nitonâski
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO:    nitonâkoyâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO:   [nitonâkoyahko, nitonâkoyahki]
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO:    nitonâkoyêko
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1SgO:    nitonawitwâwi # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2SgO:    nitonâskwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO:    nitonâkoyâhkwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO:   nitonâkoyahkwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO:    nitonâkoyêkwâwi

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:    nitonâmici # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:    nitonâmiski
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:    nitonâkoyâhki
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+12PlO:   [nitonâkoyahko, nitonâkoyahki]
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:    nitonâkoyêko

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    nitonawâci # THIRD DIR
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nitonawâtwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: nitonawâyici
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    nitonâmâci
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    nitonâmâtwâwi

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    nitonâkoci # THIRD INV
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    nitonâkotwâwi
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: nitonâkoyici

## IMPERATIVE ##
#LOCAL IMMEDIATE#
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:    nitonawin
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:    nitonawinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:    nitonawinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:    nitonawik
#LOCAL DELAYED#
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO:    nitonawîhkan
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO:    nitonawîhkâhk
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1PlO:    nitonawîhkâhk
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO:    nitonawîhkêk

#MIXED IMMEDIATE#
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:    nitonaw # Obj. Sg.
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:    nitonawihk
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO:    nitonawâtân

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:    nitonawik # Obj. Pl.
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:    nitonawihkok
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO:    nitonawâtânik
#MIXED DELAYED#
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO:    nitonawâhkan # Obj. Sg.
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO:    nitonawâhkêk
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO:    nitonawâhkahk

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO:    nitonawâhkanik # Obj. Pl.
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO:    nitonawâhkêkok
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO:    nitonawâhkahkok


###PRT###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1SgO:    kikî-nitonawin # LOCAL DIR
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1PlO:    kikî-nitonawinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1PlO:    kikî-nitonawinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1SgO:    kikî-nitonawinâwâw

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+2SgO:    kikî-nitonâtin # LOCAL INVERSE
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+2SgO:    kikî-nitonâtinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+2PlO:    kikî-nitonâtinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+2PlO:    kikî-nitonâtinâwâw

## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-kî-nitonawiyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-kî-nitonawiyâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-kî-nitonawiyâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-kî-nitonawiyêk

     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-kî-nitonâtân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-kî-nitonâtâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-kî-nitonâtâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-kî-nitonâtakok


###FUT+INT###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO:    kiwî-nitonawin # LOCAL DIR
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1PlO:    kiwî-nitonawinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1PlO:    kiwî-nitonawinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO:    kiwî-nitonawinâwâw

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+2SgO:    kiwî-nitonâtin # LOCAL INVERSE
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+2SgO:    kiwî-nitonâtinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+2PlO:    kiwî-nitonâtinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+2PlO:    kiwî-nitonâtinâwâw
